Washington statutes.
RCW 36.09.010

Debts and property to be apportioned.

Whenever a new county shall be or shall have been organized out of the territory which was included within the limits of any other county or counties, the new county shall be liable for a reasonable proportion of the debts of the county from which it was taken, and entitled to its proportion of the property of the county.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.09.010. Prior: Code 1881 s 2657; 1863 p 538 s 3; 1854 p 330 s 1; RRS s 3986.]